Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Penalties

281.990.
Penalties.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a person shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) and no more than two hundred dollars ($200), if the person:

Violates, causes, aids, or abets any violation of the provisions of this chapter, or any order, rule, or administrative regulation lawfully issued pursuant to authority granted by this chapter;

Knowingly makes any false or erroneous statement, report, or representation to the Department of Vehicle Regulation with respect to any matter placed under the jurisdiction of the department by this chapter;

Knowingly makes any false entry in the accounts or records required to be kept pursuant to the authority granted by this chapter; or

Knowingly fails to keep, or knowingly destroys or mutilates, any accounts or records.

Every device to evade or to prevent the application of any provision of this chapter, or any lawful order, rule or administrative regulation of the department issued pursuant thereto, shall constitute a violation thereof.

Any person who violates KRS 281.630(1) or 281.631(1) shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500).

Any person who operates as a motor carrier in violation of the terms of his or her certificate or motor carrier vehicle license shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500).

A person who violates KRS 281.630(9) shall not be subject to a penalty under this section.

Except as provided in this subsection, any person who violates KRS

281.757

shall be fined two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each offense.

A person who is cited for a violation of KRS

281.757

in which the lights were inoperable or the reflectors were missing may, within thirty (30) days from the date of the citation, provide proof to the county attorney of the county in which the offense occurred that the mechanical problem has been repaired and that the lights are in working order or that the required reflectors have been placed on the vehicle. If such proof is shown, the citation shall be dismissed.

A law enforcement officer and the department shall not issue a citation to a person as violating KRS 281.757 if the atmospheric conditions all motorists were subjected to at the time the person is stopped reasonably limit the ability of a person to keep the vehicle’s lights or reflectors from being obscured by dirt, mud, or debris.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 56; 1960, ch. 139, § 10; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1978, ch. 101, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 7, effective July 1, 1979; 1998, ch. 331, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 512, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 159, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2015 ch. 19, § 33, effective June 24, 2015.

281.999.
Prepayment of fines subject to certain conditions.

All offenses classified as violations under this chapter shall be prepayable except:

Any offense which could result in license suspension or revocation by the court;

An offense where evidence of the offense or of commission of another offense is seized by the officer and the citation is so marked and a court date set;

The offense is cited with another offense that is not prepayable; or

An arrest is made under KRS

431.015

.

In the event that a prepayable offense is cited with another offense that is not prepayable, a court appearance shall be required on all of the offenses as required by KRS

431.452

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 512, § 8, effective July 14, 2000.